North Carolina statutes. Chapter 134. Youth Development.
§§ 134-1 through 134-39.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 134A-1

to 134A-39.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter was rewritten by Session Laws 1975, c. 742, effective July 1, 1975, and recodified as Chapter 134A. Chapter 134A was subsequently repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 1(a); see notes under

G.S. 134A-1

through 134A-39.

Cross References.

As to the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, see G.S. 143B-800 et seq.